test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-njuono_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - njuono: # N_ODD_WG_oH 'tip of a reideer herd'
    njuono+N+Sg+Nom: njuono
    njuono+N+Sg+Gen: njunnuha
    njuono+N+Sg+Acc: njunnuhav
    njuono+N+Sg+Ill: njunnuhij
    njuono+N+Sg+Ine: njunnuhin
    njuono+N+Sg+Ela: [njunnuhist, njunnuhis]
    njuono+N+Sg+Com: njunnuhijn
    njuono+N+Pl+Nom: njunnuha
    njuono+N+Pl+Gen: njunnuhij
    njuono+N+Pl+Acc: njunnuhijt
    njuono+N+Pl+Ill: njunnuhijda
    njuono+N+Pl+Ine: njunnuhijn
    njuono+N+Pl+Ela: [njunnuhijst, njunnuhijs]
    njuono+N+Pl+Com: [njunnuhij, njunnuhijgum]
#    njuono+N+Ess: njunnuhin !??
#    njuono+N+Abe: njunnuhak !??
